Colorado, session 2026A, SB140.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 10-16-1415
as follows:
10-16-1415. Exemptions - prescription drugs derived from
cannabis - prescription drugs for rare diseases and conditions -
licensed biological products derived from human whole blood or
plasma.
(1) Notwithstanding any provision of this part 14 to the contrary,
the board has no authority to perform an affordability review of, or to
establish an upper payment limit for, any A prescription drug that is:
(a) Derived in whole or in part from cannabis;
(b) DESIGNATED AS A DRUG FOR A RARE DISEASE OR CONDITION BY
THE FDA PURSUANT TO 21 U.S.C. SEC. 360bb; OR
(c) A LICENSED BIOLOGICAL PRODUCT THAT IS DERIVED FROM
HUMAN WHOLE BLOOD OR PLASMA AS INDICATED ON PRODUCT LABELING
APPROVED BY THE FDA PURSUANT TO 42 U.S.C. SEC. 262. THE BOARD
SHALL REFER TO PRODUCT INFORMATION AVAILABLE ON THE FDA'S
APPROVED BLOOD PRODUCTS WEBSITE, INCLUDING THE LIST OF
FRACTIONATED PLASMA PRODUCTS, TO DETERMINE WHETHER A PRODUCT
IS DERIVED FROM HUMAN WHOLE BLOOD OR PLASMA.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
-2- 140

12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-3- 140